Utah statutes.
19-6-115.   Imminent danger to health or environment -- Authority of executive director to initiate action to restrain.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, upon receipt of evidence that the handling, transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of any solid or hazardous waste, or a release from an underground storage tank, is presenting an imminent and substantial danger to health or the environment, the executive director may bring suit on behalf of this state in the district court to immediately restrain any person contributing, or who has contributed, to that action to stop the handling, storage, treatment, transportation, or disposal or to take other action as appropriate.

